Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB803.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 441.225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for capital improvements, utilities and building insurance and except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the jailer shall have authority to authorize
expenditures from the jail budget. These[Such] expenditures shall only be made in
accordance with the line item jail budget duly adopted or amended by the fiscal
court and the established county procurement code or purchase order procedure of
the county. Payment for purchases for the jail shall be subject to fiscal court
approval prior to payment. The fiscal court shall not withhold approval of payment
for jail expenditures which are within the jail budget and not unlawful.
(2) The jailer shall submit, in accordance with county payroll procedures, time reports
for all full-time and part-time jail personnel and employees to the county treasurer
or other designated payroll official. The county treasurer shall review and pay
those[such] claims in accordance with policies and procedures for the payment of
other county employees.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:51 AM Jacketed